North Carolina, session 2025, SB425.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 90-157.4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-157.4. Civil penalty; disciplinary costs.
…
(d) If a licensee is found to have violated any provisions of this Article or any rule adopted
by the Board, the Board may charge the costs of a disciplinary proceeding, proceeding if the
disciplinary action results in a disposition other than complete exoneration of the licensee. The
total cumulative costs under this subsection, including reasonable attorneys' fees, meeting costs,
investigative fees, and any other costs, shall not exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000) charged
to that licensee. For the purposes of this section, the term "disciplinary action" includes any
investigation, informal evidentiary review, settlement conference, negotiation, probable cause
hearing, disciplinary review committee meeting, full Board meeting, or any combination of those
types of proceedings.
(d1) Any provision in an informal settlement, consent order, final agency decision, or other
dispositive document in which the licensee consents to pay costs in an amount greater than two
thousand dollars ($2,000) is void and unenforceable against the licensee.
(e) If the Board imposes a civil penalty under this section, the party against whom the
civil penalty has been assessed may file a petition for judicial review under Article 4 of Chapter
150B of the General Statutes."
SECTION 2. G.S. 90-144 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-144. Meetings of the North Carolina State Board of Chiropractic Examiners.
(a) The North Carolina State Board of Chiropractic Examiners shall meet at least once a
year at such time and place as the Board shall determine and advertise.
(b) The Board is a public body, as that term is defined in Article 33C of Chapter 143 of
the General Statutes, and shall keep full and accurate minutes of all official meetings in
conformity with all of the following:
(1) Except as provided in G.S. 143-318.18, the contents of the treasurer's,
director's, and attorney's reports and each committee report shall be
summarized.
(2) Except as provided in G.S. 143-318.18, for any matter that comes before the
Board in an open session or in which the chair invites comments, the minutes
shall include the names of persons making public comments and a summary
*S425-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
of those comments, including any rationale or justification offered in support
or opposition to the matter under discussion.
(3) For any motion disposed of by the Board's vote, the minutes shall include the
motion verbiage and the corresponding vote of each member of the Board.
(4) The Board shall publish a draft version of the minutes within 15 business days
after each meeting and the final version immediately upon approval of those
minutes.
(c) Applicants for licensure under this Article shall comply with G.S. 90-143(b)."
SECTION 3. The North Carolina State Board of Chiropractic Examiners shall adopt
rules to implement this act.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to disciplinary
actions, as that term is defined by Section 1 of this act, on or after that date.
Page 2 Senate Bill 425-First Edition